Washington statutes.
RCW 35.89.090

Violations—Penalties—Personal liability.

Every ordinance, resolution, order, or action of the council, board, or officer of any city or town, and every warrant or other instrument made, issued, passed or done in violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be void.

Every officer, agent, employee, or member of the council of the city or town, and every person or corporation who shall knowingly commit any violation of the provisions of this chapter or knowingly aid in such violation, shall be liable to the city or town for all money transferred, diverted or paid out in violation thereof and such liability shall attach to and be enforceable against the official bond, if any, of such official agent, employee, or member of the council.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.89.090. Prior: 1923 c 52 s 9; RRS s 9154-9.]